Wyoming, session 2025, SF0004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-1-104(a)(vi)(P), 7-2-101(a)(iv)(G),
7-2-106(e)(ii) and 35-7-1002(a)(xxiv) are amended to read:
6-1-104. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act, unless otherwise defined:
(vi) "Peace officer" includes the following
officers assigned to duty in the state of Wyoming:
(P) Any superintendent, assistant
superintendent, or full-time district manager, park ranger
or reserve park ranger of any state park, state recreation
area, state archeological site or state historic site who
has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707,
when acting within the boundaries of the state park, state
recreation area, state archeological site or state historic
site or when responding to a request to assist other peace
officers acting within the scope enforcing felony statutes
following observation or discovery of the commission of a
felony which was observed or discovered during the
performance of their official duties; in their own
jurisdiction;
7-2-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in W.S. 7-2-101 through 7-2-107:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) "Peace officer" means:
(G) Any superintendent, assistant
superintendent, or full-time district manager, park ranger
or reserve park ranger of any state park, state recreation
area, state archeological site or state historic site who
has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707,
when acting within the boundaries of the state park, state
recreation area, state archeological site or state historic
site, or when responding to a request to assist other peace
officers performing enforcing felony statutes following
observation or discovery of the commission of a felony
which was observed or discovered during the performance of
their official duties;
7-2-106. Extraterritorial authority of peace
officers; requests for assignment of peace officers;
liability; compensation.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize a peace officer:
(ii) As defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E) or (G)
to act pursuant to paragraph (a)(ii) or (iii) or subsection
(b) of this section; or
35-7-1002. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xxiv) "Law enforcement officer" means any
sheriff, undersheriff or sheriff's deputy of any county of
this state, any duly authorized municipal policeman of any
city or town of this state, any member of the Wyoming
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
highway patrol, any police officer of the University of
Wyoming or any Wyoming community college who is a peace
officer, any superintendent, assistant superintendent, or
full-time district manager, park ranger or reserve park
ranger of a state park, state recreation area, state
archeological site or state historic site who has qualified
pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707, when acting
within the boundaries of the state park, state recreation
area, state archeological site or state historic site or
when responding to a request to assist other law
enforcement officers acting within the scope of their
official duties in their own jurisdiction enforcing felony
statutes following observation or discovery of the
commission of a felony which was observed or discovered
during the performance of their official duties, or any
special agent employed by the commissioner under this act;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4